Illinois, session 104th, SB3617.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Government Fraud Prevention Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Local Government Fraud Prevention Task Force. 7The Local Government Fraud Prevention Task Force is 8established. The Task Force is specifically charged with 9advising the General Assembly on steps needed to modernize and 10improve fraud prevention, detection, and investigation in 11local governments. 12    Section 10. Duties. The Task Force shall make 13recommendations to the General Assembly on how to prevent, 14detect, and investigate fraud at the local government level. 15The Task Force's recommendations shall include recommendations 16regarding the following actions, which may be taken to improve 17fraud prevention, detection, and investigation: 18        (1) monitoring the creation and reporting of bank 19    accounts used by local governments; 20        (2) expanding the investigative and prosecutorial 21    capabilities of the State in regard to corruption and 22    fraud at the local level;   SB3617- 2 -LRB104 13782 RTM 26549 b1        (3) examining the scope and standard practices of 2    government auditing and accounting; 3        (4) examining existing transparency laws; and 4        (5) exploring possibilities for training new local 5    government officials on financial oversight 6    responsibilities and powers. 7    Section 15. Membership. The Task Force shall consist of 8the following members: 9        (1) a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the 10    Speaker of the House of Representatives;11        (2) a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the 12    Minority Leader of the House of Representatives;13        (3) a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the 14    President of the Senate;15        (4) a member of the General Assembly, appointed by the 16    Minority Leader of the Senate;17        (5) a representative from the Illinois Municipal 18    League, appointed by the Governor;19        (6) a representative of counties in the State, 20    appointed by the Governor; 21        (7) a representative of townships in the State, 22    appointed by the Governor;23        (8) an active certified fraud examiner, appointed by 24    the Governor; 25        (9) a retired certified fraud examiner with experience   SB3617- 3 -LRB104 13782 RTM 26549 b1    on Illinois cases, appointed by the Governor; 2        (10) a representative of the Illinois State Police and 3    other relevant law enforcement agencies, appointed by the 4    Governor; and 5        (11) a current or retired prosecutor with experience 6    prosecuting fraud against local governments in Illinois, 7    appointed by the Governor. 8    All members of the Task Force shall serve without 9compensation. The appointing authorities shall make 10appointments to the Task Force as soon as practicable after 11the effective date of this Act. At the initial meeting of the 12Task Force, the members of the Task Force shall elect 2 13co-chairs from among the members of the Task Force appointed 14under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4). 15    Section 20. Meetings. The Task Force shall hold its 16initial meeting within 120 days of the effective date of this 17Act. Subsequent meetings of the Task Force shall convene at 18the call of the co-chairs of the Task Force. 19    Section 25. Support. The Department of Central Management 20Services shall provide administrative support to the Task 21Force as needed. 22    Section 30. Report. On or before December 31, 2026, the 23Task Force shall report its recommendations by filing copies   SB3617- 4 -LRB104 13782 RTM 26549 b1of a report with the Governor and the General Assembly. Upon 2filing its report, the Task Force is dissolved. 3    Section 35. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 42028. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.